src/orthography/cyrillic2latin.xfscript
! ======
! Conversion from lat to cyr
! =======

echo <<defining Cns and Vow...>>

define Vow       [ а | э | ы | о | у | я | е | и | ё | ю
                   А | Э | Ы | О | У | Я | Е | И | Ё | Ю ] ;

define NonPalVow [ а | э | ы | о | у | я | е | и | ё | ю ] ;

define PalVow    [ А | Э | Ы | О | У | Я | Е | И | Ё | Ю ] ;

define Cns      [ б | в | г | д | ж | з | й | к | л | м | н | 
                  п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ |
                  Б | В | Г | Д | Ж | З | Й | К | Л | М | Н |
                  П | Р | С | Т | Ф | Х | Ц | Ч | Ш | Щ ] ;

define Dental [ д | з | к | с | т  ] ;

define Syll Cns* Vow+ Cns* ;

echo << Rules >>



define consgroups S j -> Ш , C h r -> К р ;

define specialvow a a -> о , A a -> О ;

define SoftSign [ ь | Ь ] ;

define HardSign [ ъ | Ъ ] ;

define PalSign [ SoftSign | HardSign ] ;

define PalVow  е -> j e , Е -> J e || [.#.|Vow|PalSign] _ ;

               


define transfer [
      а -> a ,
      б -> b ,
      в -> v ,
      г -> g ,
      д -> d ,
      е -> e ,
      ё -> j o ,
      ж -> d z j ,
      з -> z ,
      и -> i ,
      й -> j ,
      к -> k ,
      л -> l ,
      м -> m ,
      н -> n ,
      о -> o ,
      п -> p ,
      р -> r ,
      с -> s ,
      т -> t ,
      у -> u ,
      ф -> f ,
      х -> k h ,
      ц -> t s ,
      ч -> t s j ,
      ш -> s j ,
      щ -> s j t s j ,
      ы -> y ,
      э -> e ,
      ю -> j u ,
      я -> j a ,
      А -> A ,
      Б -> B ,
      В -> V ,
      Г -> G ,
      Д -> D ,
      Е -> E ,
      Ë -> J o ,
      Ж -> D z j ,
      З -> Z ,
      И -> I ,
      Й -> J ,
      К -> K ,
      Л -> L ,
      М -> M ,
      Н -> N ,
      О -> O ,
      П -> P ,
      Р -> R ,
      С -> S ,
      Т -> T ,
      У -> U ,
      Ф -> F ,
      Х -> K h ,
      Ц -> T s ,
      Ч -> T s j ,
      Ш -> S j ,
      Щ -> S j t s j ,
      Ы -> Y ,
      Э -> E ,
      Ю -> J u ,
      Я -> J a ] ;


define jBeforeSoft j -> i || Dental _ Vow ;

define SoftMarking SoftSign -> ’ ;
define SoftMarking SoftSign -> ’ ;
!define SoftMarking SoftSign -> ’ ;

define PalDeletion PalSign -> 0 ;

echo << Compile... >>

read regex [
     PalVow
 .o. transfer 
 .o. jBeforeSoft
 .o. SoftMarking
 .o. PalDeletion
 ] ;

invert net ;
